Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.270

Annual basic education allocation of funds according to average FTE student enrollment—Procedure for crediting portion for school building purposes.

The board of directors of a school district may, by properly executed resolution, request that the superintendent of public instruction direct a portion of the district's basic education allocation be credited to the district's capital projects fund and/or bond redemption fund. Moneys so credited shall be used solely for school building purposes.

[ 1985 c 7 s 89; 1980 c 154 s 13. Formerly RCW 28A.41.143.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective dates—Savings—Disposition of certain funds—Severability—1980 c 154: See notes following chapter 82.45 RCW digest.

School district funds: RCW 28A.320.330.